Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-627
Intersections; improvement; cost; tax levy.

The cost and expense of improving, constructing, or repairing streets, avenues, alleys, and sidewalks, at their intersections, may be included in the special tax levied for the construction or improvement of any one street, avenue, alley, or sidewalk, as may be deemed best by the city council.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 75, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 4922;

C.S.1922, § 4090;

C.S.1929, § 16-619;

R.S.1943, § 16-627;

Laws 1967, c. 67, § 10, p. 224;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 94.